Utah statutes.
76-6-403.   Theft -- Evidence to support accusation.
Conduct denominated theft in this part constitutes a single offense embracing
the separate offenses such as those heretofore known as larceny, larceny by
trick, larceny by bailees, embezzlement, false pretense, extortion, blackmail,
receiving stolen property. An accusation of theft may be supported by evidence
that it was committed in any manner specified in Sections 76-6-404 through
76-6-410, subject to the power of the court to ensure a fair trial by granting
a continuance or other appropriate relief where the conduct of the defense
would be prejudiced by lack of fair notice or by surprise.
